test/src/morphology/N-kiilj23_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kiiĺ: # Noun (23) kiiĺ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Nom: kiiĺ
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Gen: keele
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Par: kiilt
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Ill: kiilde
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Gen: [kiili, keelte]
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Par: kiili
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Ill: [kiilihe, kiili]
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+All: [keelile, keeltele]
